Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.265

Valuation of property to be mortgaged—Appraiser's opinion.

When, under any provision of this title, a written report is required of members of the board of investment of a mutual savings bank certifying according to their best judgment the value of any property to be mortgaged such value may be determined upon the signed opinion in writing of an appraiser appointed by the board of trustees of such bank.

[ 1957 c 80 s 9.]